Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.25.030

Specific social purposes.

In addition to the general social purpose set forth in RCW 23B.25.020, every corporation governed by this chapter may have one or more specific social purposes for which the corporation is organized.

[ 2012 c 215 s 4.]